Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 6. Companies in Which Commonwealth Is Interested.

§§ 56-44 through 56-46.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-46.1.
Commission to consider environmental, economic and improvements in service reliability factors in approving construction of electrical utility facilities; approval required for construction of certain electrical transmission lines; notice and hearings.

Whenever the Commission is required to approve the construction of any electrical utility facility, it shall give consideration to the effect of that facility on the environment and establish such conditions as may be desirable or necessary to minimize
adverse environmental impact. In order to avoid duplication of governmental activities, any valid permit or approval required for an electric generating plant and associated facilities issued or granted by a federal, state or local
governmental entity charged by law with responsibility for issuing permits or approvals regulating environmental impact and mitigation of adverse environmental impact or for other specific public interest issues such as building
codes, transportation plans, and public safety, whether such permit or approval is granted prior to or after the Commission’s decision, shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section with respect to all matters that
(i) are governed by the permit or approval or (ii) are within the authority of, and were considered by, the governmental entity in issuing such permit or approval, and the Commission shall impose no additional conditions with respect
to such matters. Nothing in this section shall affect the ability of the Commission to keep the record of a case open. Nothing in this section shall affect any right to appeal such permits or approvals in accordance with applicable
law. In the case of a proposed facility located in a region that was designated as of July 1, 2001, as serious nonattainment for the one-hour ozone standard as set forth in the federal Clean Air Act, the Commission shall not issue
a decision approving such proposed facility that is conditioned upon issuance of any environmental permit or approval. In every proceeding under this subsection, the Commission shall receive and give consideration to all reports
that relate to the proposed facility by state agencies concerned with environmental protection; and if requested by any county or municipality in which the facility is proposed to be built, to local comprehensive plans that have
been adopted pursuant to Article 3 (§

15.2-2223

et seq.) of Chapter 22 of Title 15.2. Additionally, the Commission (a) shall consider the effect of the proposed facility on economic development within the Commonwealth, including but not limited to furtherance
of the economic and job creation objectives of the Commonwealth Clean Energy Policy set forth in §

45.2-1706.1

, and (b) shall consider any improvements in service reliability that may result from the construction of such facility.

Subject to the provisions of subsection J, no electrical transmission line of 138 kilovolts or more shall be constructed unless the State Corporation Commission shall, after at least 30 days’ advance notice by (i) publication in a newspaper or newspapers
of general circulation in the counties and municipalities through which the line is proposed to be built, (ii) written notice to the governing body of each such county and municipality, and (iii) causing to be sent a copy of the
notice by first class mail to all owners of property within the route of the proposed line, as indicated on the map or sketch of the route filed with the Commission, which requirement shall be satisfied by mailing the notice to
such persons at such addresses as are indicated in the land books maintained by the commissioner of revenue, director of finance or treasurer of the county or municipality, approve such line. Such notices shall include a written
description of the proposed route the line is to follow, as well as a map or sketch of the route including a digital geographic information system (GIS) map provided by the public utility showing the location of the proposed route.
The Commission shall make GIS maps provided under this subsection available to the public on the Commission’s website. Such notices shall be in addition to the advance notice to the chief administrative officer of the county or
municipality required pursuant to §

15.2-2202

.As a condition to approval the Commission shall determine that the line is needed and that the corridor or route chosen for the line will avoid or reasonably minimize adverse impact to the greatest extent reasonably
practicable on the scenic assets, historic resources recorded with the Department of Historic Resources, and environment of the area concerned. To assist the Commission in this determination, as part of the application for Commission
approval of the line, the applicant shall summarize its efforts to avoid or reasonably minimize adverse impact to the greatest extent reasonably practicable on the scenic assets, historic resources recorded with the Department
of Historic Resources, and environment of the area concerned. In making the determinations about need, corridor or route, and method of installation, the Commission shall verify the applicant’s load flow modeling, contingency analyses,
and reliability needs presented to justify the new line and its proposed method of installation. If the local comprehensive plan of an affected county or municipality designates corridors or routes for electric transmission lines
and the line is proposed to be constructed outside such corridors or routes, in any hearing the county or municipality may provide adequate evidence that the existing planned corridors or routes designated in the plan can adequately
serve the needs of the company. Additionally, the Commission shall consider, upon the request of the governing body of any county or municipality in which the line is proposed to be constructed, (a) the costs and economic benefits
likely to result from requiring the underground placement of the line and (b) any potential impediments to timely construction of the line.

If, prior to such approval, any interested party shall request a public hearing, the Commission shall, as soon as reasonably practicable after such request, hold such hearing or hearings at such place as may be designated by the Commission. In any hearing
the public service company shall provide adequate evidence that existing rights-of-way cannot adequately serve the needs of the company.If, prior to such approval, written requests therefor are received from the governing body
of any county or municipality through which the line is proposed to be built or from 20 or more interested parties, the Commission shall hold at least one hearing in the area that would be affected by construction of the line,
for the purpose of receiving public comment on the proposal. If any hearing is to be held in the area affected, the Commission shall direct that a copy of the transcripts of any previous hearings held in the case be made available
for public inspection at a convenient location in the area for a reasonable time before such local hearing.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Environment” or “environmental” shall be deemed to include in meaning “historic,” as well as a consideration of the probable effects of the line on the health and safety of the
persons in the area concerned.“Interested parties” shall include the governing bodies of any counties or municipalities through which the line is proposed to be built, and persons residing or owning property in each such county
or municipality.“Public utility” means a public utility as defined in § 56-265.1.“Qualifying facilities” means a cogeneration or small power production facility which meets the criteria of 18 C.F.R. Part 292.“Reasonably accommodate
requests to wheel or transmit power” means:

That the applicant will make available to new electric generation facilities constructed after January 9, 1991, qualifying facilities and other nonutilities, a minimum of one-fourth of the total megawatts of the additional transmission capacity created
by the proposed line, for the purpose of wheeling to public utility purchasers the power generated by such qualifying facilities and other nonutility facilities which are awarded a power purchase contract by a public utility
purchaser in compliance with applicable state law or regulations governing bidding or capacity acquisition programs for the purchase of electric capacity from nonutility sources, provided that the obligation of the applicant
will extend only to those requests for wheeling service made within the 12 months following certification by the State Corporation Commission of the transmission line and with effective dates for commencement of such service
within the 12 months following completion of the transmission line; and

That the wheeling service offered by the applicant, pursuant to subdivision D 1, will reasonably further the purposes of the Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P. L. 95-617), as demonstrated by submitting to the Commission, with its application
for approval of the line, the cost methodologies, terms, conditions, and dispatch and interconnection requirements the applicant intends, subject to any applicable requirements of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission,
to include in its agreements for such wheeling service.

In the event that, at any time after the giving of the notice required in subsection B, it appears to the Commission that consideration of a route or routes significantly different from the route described in the notice is desirable, the Commission shall
cause notice of the new route or routes to be published and mailed in accordance with subsection B. The Commission shall thereafter comply with the provisions of this section with respect to the new route or routes to the full
extent necessary to give affected localities and interested parties in the newly affected areas the same protection afforded to affected localities and interested parties affected by the route described in the original notice.

Approval of a transmission line pursuant to this section shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of §

15.2-2232

and local zoning ordinances with respect to such transmission line.

The Commission shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the Department of Environmental Quality regarding the coordination of their reviews of the environmental impact of electric generating plants and associated facilities.

An applicant that is required to obtain (i) a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Commission for any electric generating facility, electric transmission line, natural or manufactured gas transmission line as defined in 49 Code of
Federal Regulations § 192.3, or natural or manufactured gas storage facility (hereafter, an energy facility) and (ii) an environmental permit for the energy facility that is subject to issuance by any agency or board within the
Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources, may request a pre-application planning and review process. In any such request to the Commission or the Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources, the applicant shall identify
the proposed energy facility for which it requests the pre-application planning and review process. The Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Marine Resources Commission, the Department of Wildlife Resources,
the Department of Historic Resources, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and other appropriate agencies of the Commonwealth shall participate in the pre-application planning and review process. Participation in such
process shall not limit the authority otherwise provided by law to the Commission or other agencies or boards of the Commonwealth. The Commission and other participating agencies of the Commonwealth may invite federal and local
governmental entities charged by law with responsibility for issuing permits or approvals to participate in the pre-application planning and review process. Through the pre-application planning and review process, the applicant,
the Commission, and other agencies and boards shall identify the potential impacts and approvals that may be required and shall develop a plan that will provide for an efficient and coordinated review of the proposed energy facility.
The plan shall include (a) a list of the permits or other approvals likely to be required based on the information available, (b) a specific plan and preliminary schedule for the different reviews, (c) a plan for coordinating those
reviews and the related public comment process, and (d) designation of points of contact, either within each agency or for the Commonwealth as a whole, to facilitate this coordination. The plan shall be made readily available to
the public and shall be maintained on a dedicated website to provide current information on the status of each component of the plan and each approval process including opportunities for public comment.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the construction and operation of a small renewable energy project, as defined in § 10.1-1197.5, by a utility regulated pursuant to this title for which the Department of Environmental Quality has issued
a permit by rule pursuant to Article 5 (§ 10.1-1197.5 et seq.) of Chapter 11.1 of Title 10.1.

Approval under this section shall not be required for any transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is not required pursuant to subdivision A of § 56-265.2.

History.
1972, c. 652; 1973, c. 307; 1974, c. 498; 1983, c. 438; 1984, cc. 287, 562; 1985, c. 282; 1991, cc. 90, 148; 1996, c. 254; 2001, c. 758; 2002, c. 483; 2007, cc. 756, 761, 776, 825; 2009, cc. 808, 854; 2011, cc. 236, 243;
2012, cc. 54, 284; 2016, cc. 192, 276; 2020, cc. 450, 958; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 327.

Cross references.

As to limitation of State Corporation Commission authority, see § 10.1-1197.8.

Editor’s note.

The Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617), referred to in subdivision D 2 of this section, is codified generally as 16 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.

Acts 2009, cc. 808 and 854, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods
of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Secretariat of Natural and Historic Resources” was twice substituted for “Secretariat of Natural Resources” in subsection H to conform to Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-1706.1

” was substituted for “§ 67-101.1” to conform with recodification of Title 67 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 1996 amendment
added the third sentence in subsection A.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 758 substituted “Article 3 (§

15.2-2223

et seq.) of Chapter 22 of Title 15.2” for “Article 4 (§ 15.1-446.1 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 15.1” in subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “(i),” substituted “(ii)” for “and,” and inserted the language beginning
“and (iii) causing to be sent” and ending “the county or municipality”; inserted “and mailed” in the first sentence in subsection E; and substituted “§

15.2-2232

” for “§ 15.1-456” in subsection F.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 483, in subsection A, inserted the second to fourth sentences, substituted “every proceeding under this subsection, the Commission” for “such proceedings it” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “shall” for “may” in clause (i)
in that sentence; and added subsection G.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 756, in subsection B, added the language beginning “including a digital” to the end of the third sentence, inserted the fourth sentence [now the third sentence], and added the last sentence [now the fifth sentence].

The 2007 amendment by c. 761, in subsection B, inserted the fourth sentence and added the last two sentences.

The 2007 amendment by c. 776 added subsection H.

The 2007 amendment by c. 825, in subsection B, deleted “overhead” preceding “electrical transmission,” substituted “138 kilovolts” for “150 kilovolts” in the first sentence; deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Such approval shall not be required
for transmission lines constructed prior to January 1, 1983, for which the Commission has issued a certificate of convenience and necessity.”; added the language beginning “including a digital” at the end of the second sentence; inserted
the present third sentence; deleted “and, in the case of any” at the end of the present fourth sentence; and added the last sentence [now the fifth sentence].

Subsection B is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 808 and 854 are identical, and added subsection I.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 236 inserted “including but not limited to furtherance of the economic and job creation objectives of the Commonwealth Energy Policy set forth in §§ 67-101 and 67-102” in the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2011 amendment by c. 243 added the sixth sentence in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 54 and 284 are identical, and substituted designators (a) and (b) for (i) and (ii) in the last sentence of subsections A and B, added “Subject to the provisions of subsection J” at the beginning of subsection B, rewrote the
portion of subsection D preceding subdivision 1, added subsection J, and made stylistic and related changes throughout the section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 192 and 276 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection C, inserted “the governing body of any county or municipality through which the line is proposed to be built or from” and substituted “that” for “which”; in
subsection E, inserted “affected localities and” and “to affected localities and.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 450, in the second paragraph of subsection B, rewrote the first two sentences, which formerly read: “As a condition to approval the Commission shall determine that the line is needed and that the corridor or route the line is
to follow will reasonably minimize adverse impact on the scenic assets, historic districts and environment of the area concerned. To assist the Commission in this determination, as part of the application for Commission approval of
the line, the applicant shall summarize its efforts to reasonably minimize adverse impact on the scenic assets, historic districts, and environment of the area concerned.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection H, third sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 327, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Commonwealth Clean Energy Policy set forth in § 67-101.1” for “Commonwealth Energy Policy set forth in §§ 67-101 and 67-102.”

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on administrative law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1159 (1972).

For article entitled “Regulation of Electric Utilities by the State Corporation Commission,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 589 (1973).

For survey of Virginia municipal corporations for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1563 (1974).

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For article, “Siting Power Lines in Historic Areas of Virginia,” see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (1995).

For article surveying changes in environmental law in Virginia from June 2001 to June 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 117 (2002).

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

For comment, “(Mis)Understanding ‘Undue Discrimination’: FERC’s Misguided Effort to Extend the Boundaries of the Federal Power Act,” see 19 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 549 (2012).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Electricity, § 2.

§ 56-46.2.
Construction of electrical transmission lines.

The construction of all overhead electrical transmission lines shall adhere to the standards set forth in the National Electrical Safety Code. The Commission shall, upon receipt of a written complaint concerning the lack of compliance with these standards
in the construction of a particular transmission line, investigate the situation and, if appropriate, exercise its powers granted under §

12.1-12

to enforce adherence to the standards.

History.
1985, c. 187.

§ 56-46.3.
Foreign utility companies; penalties.

The provisions of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (PUHCA), which is set out at § 1261 et seq. of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, stipulate that certain exemptions afforded a foreign utility company (FUCO) under PUHCA are not applicable unless
every state commission having jurisdiction over the retail electric or gas rates of a public utility company that is an associate company or an affiliate of a company (other than a public utility company that is an associate company
or an affiliate of a registered holding company under PUHCA) has certified to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) that it has the authority and resources to protect ratepayers subject to its jurisdiction and that
it intends to exercise its authority.

Upon application to the Commission by any person that (i) is an affiliated interest of a public service company, as such terms are defined in Chapter 4 (§ 56-76 et seq.) of this title, (ii) proposes to invest in or acquire a specific FUCO, and (iii) is
not a registered holding company under PUHCA, and subject to the proviso contained herein, the Commission shall have the authority to impose upon, and require of, the applicant, the public service company, and any other “affiliated
interests” of such public service company, such terms, conditions, limitations, restrictions, undertakings and commitments as the Commission deems necessary to protect the public interest from any adverse effects attributable to
such proposed FUCO investment or acquisition, including such provisions for the enforcement thereof as the Commission shall deem necessary; and, upon doing so, may certify to the SEC that the Commission has the authority and resources
to protect the ratepayers of such public service company subject to its jurisdiction and that it intends to exercise its authority; provided, however, that such applicant, the public service company, and such other affiliated interests
of such public service company shall have furnished to the Commission, prior to delivery of said certification to the SEC, and in the manner prescribed by the Commission, a written statement accepting all such terms, conditions,
limitations, restrictions, undertakings and commitments, as the Commission shall have so specified.

The Commission shall have the power to enforce the terms, conditions, limitations, restrictions, undertakings and commitments upon which said certification was based, including the power to penalize for and enjoin the violation or attempted violation
thereof, and to issue mandatory injunctions requiring such actions as may be in the public interest to remedy any such violation or attempted violation. Any person committing any such violation or attempted violation, or failing
or refusing to obey any order or injunction of the Commission issued under this section, may be fined by the Commission such sum, not exceeding $100,000, as the Commission may deem proper, and each day’s continuance of such condition
shall be a separate offense.

History.
1997, c. 110; 2014, c. 192.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 192 in subsection A, substituted “the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (PUHCA), which is set out as § 1261 et seq. of the Energy Policy Act of 2005” for “§ 33(a)(2) of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935 (PUHCA),
as amended, 15 U.S.C. § 79, et seq.” and “U.S.” for “United States,” deleted “§ 33(a)(1) of” preceding “PUHCA are not,” and deleted “otherwise exempted under said § 33(a)(1)” following “of a company”; and substituted “any person that”
for “any person which” in subsection B.